Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.460

Prohibited acts—Penalties.

(1) Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter or fails to comply with the rules adopted under this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section.

(2) Any commission merchant, dealer, or cash buyer, or any person assuming or attempting to act as a commission merchant, dealer, or cash buyer without a license is guilty of a class C felony who:

(a) Imposes false charges for handling or services in connection with agricultural products.

(b) Makes fictitious sales or is guilty of collusion to defraud the consignor.

(c) Intentionally makes false statement or statements as to the grade, conditions, markings, quality, or quantity of goods shipped or packed in any manner.

(d) With the intent to defraud the consignor, fails to comply with the requirements set forth under RCW * 20.01.010(10), 20.01.390, or 20.01.430.

(3) Any person who violates the provisions of RCW 20.01.040, 20.01.080, 20.01.120, 20.01.125, 20.01.410, or 20.01.610 has committed a civil infraction.

(4) Unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be prosecuted under RCW 9A.56.060.

[ 2003 c 395 s 8; 1989 c 354 s 43; 1988 c 254 s 19; 1986 c 178 s 13; 1982 c 20 s 4; 1959 c 139 s 46.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 20.01.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (10) to subsection (4).

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.